Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.465

Structural pest inspector—Forms of evidence of financial responsibility—Amount—Terms.

(1) The following requirements apply to the forms of evidence of financial responsibility required under RCW 15.58.460.

(a) Errors and Omissions Insurance. The amount of the errors and omissions insurance policy required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(a) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars. The insurance policy shall be maintained at not less than the required sum at all times during the licensed period. The insurance policy shall provide coverage for errors and omissions in an inspection conducted during the term of the policy. However, the policy may limit the insurer's liability on the policy in effect at the time of the inspection to two years from the date of the inspection.

(b) Surety Bond. The amount of the surety bond required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(b) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars. The surety bond shall be maintained at not less than the required sum at all times during the licensed period. Any person having a claim against the structural pest inspector for legal damages as a result of the actions of the structural pest inspector may bring suit upon the bond in the court of the county in which the inspection took place or of the county in which jurisdiction of the structural pest inspector may be had. The surety issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. The suit upon the bond must be commenced within two years of the date of the inspection.

(c) Surety Bond and Errors and Omissions Insurance. The amount of the surety bond required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(c) shall not be less than twelve thousand five hundred dollars. Except as to the amount of the bond, the terms of the bond shall be identical to those set forth in (b) of this subsection. The amount of the errors and omissions insurance policy required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(c) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars. The insurance policy shall be maintained at not less than the required sum at all times during the licensed period. The insurance policy shall provide coverage for errors and omissions in an inspection conducted during the term of the policy.

(d) Assigned Account. The amount of the assigned account required by RCW 15.58.460(2)(d) shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars. The assigned account shall be held by the department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against the inspector for legal damages resulting from errors and omissions in the conduct of an inspection, according to the provisions of the assigned account agreement. The department has no liability for payment in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(i) The assigned account agreement filed with the director as evidence of financial responsibility shall be canceled at the expiration of two years after the inspector's license has expired or been revoked, or at the expiration of two years after the inspector has furnished another form of evidence of financial responsibility required by RCW 15.58.460, unless legal action has been instituted against the inspector prior to the expiration of the two-year period and the director has been provided written notice of the same by the claimant. In such a case the director shall not cancel the assigned account agreement until the director either receives a copy of the order dismissing the action by registered or certified mail, or has received a copy of the unsatisfied judgment and has complied with the requirements of (d)(ii) of this subsection.

(ii) Any person having an unsatisfied final judgment against the inspector for legal damages awarded based on errors and omissions in the conduct of an inspection may execute upon the funds in the assigned account by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall direct the financial institution to pay from the assigned account, through the registry of the court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment from the assigned account shall be the order of receipt of the final judgment by the department.

(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section that limits the time period in which a suit must be commenced on a surety bond or in which a claim must be made on a policy effects the statute of limitations applicable to any claim any person may have against the structural pest inspector or company.

(3) The director may only accept a surety bond or insurance policy as evidence of financial responsibility if the bond or policy is issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. The director shall be notified ten days before any reduction of insurance coverage at the request of the applicant or cancellation of the surety bond or insurance by the surety or insurer and by the insured.

(4) The total and aggregate of the surety and insurer for all claims is limited to the face of the surety bond or insurance policy. The director may accept a surety bond or insurance policy in the proper sum that has a deductible clause in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars for the total amount of surety bond or insurance required by this section. If the applicant has not satisfied the requirement of the deductible amount in any prior legal claim the deductible clause may not be accepted by the director unless the applicant furnishes the director with a surety bond or insurance policy which satisfies the amount of the deductible as to all claims that may arise.

[ 2003 c 212 s 10; 2000 c 96 s 4.]